Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 36-105.
Enforcement of Code; appeals from decisions of local department; inspection of buildings; inspection warrants; inspection of elevators; issuance of permits.

Enforcement generally. Enforcement of the provisions of the Building Code for construction and rehabilitation shall be the responsibility of the local building department. There shall be established within each local building department a local board of Building Code appeals whose composition, duties and responsibilities shall be prescribed in the Building Code. Any person aggrieved by the local building department’s application of the Building Code or refusal to grant a modification to the provisions of the Building Code may appeal to the local board of Building Code appeals. No appeal to the State Building Code Technical Review Board shall lie prior to a final determination by the local board of Building Code appeals. Whenever a county or a municipality does not have such a building department or board of Building Code appeals, the local governing body shall enter into an agreement with the local governing body of another county or municipality or with some other agency, or a state agency approved by the Department for such enforcement and appeals resulting therefrom.For the purposes of this section, towns with a population of less than 3,500 may elect to administer and enforce the Building Code; however, where the town does not elect to administer and enforce the Building Code, the county in which the town is situated shall administer and enforce the Building Code for the town. In the event that such town is situated in two or more counties, those counties shall administer and enforce the Building Code for that portion of the town situated within their respective boundaries. Additionally, the local governing body of a county or municipality may enter into an agreement with the governing body of another county or municipality for the provision to such county or municipality’s local building department of technical assistance with administration and enforcement of the Building Code.

New construction. Any building or structure may be inspected at any time before completion, and shall not be deemed in compliance until approved by the inspecting authority. Where the construction cost is less than $2,500, however, the inspection may, in the discretion of the inspecting authority, be waived. A building official may issue an annual permit for any construction regulated by the Building Code. The building official shall coordinate all reports of inspections for compliance with the Building Code, with inspections of fire and health officials delegated such authority, prior to issuance of an occupancy permit. Fees may be levied by the local governing body in order to defray the cost of such enforcement and appeals. With the exception of the levy imposed pursuant to §

36-137

, any fees levied pursuant to this subsection shall be used only to support the functions of the local building department.

Existing buildings and structures.

Inspections and enforcement of the Building Code. The local governing body may also inspect and enforce the provisions of the Building Code for existing buildings and structures, whether occupied or not. Such inspection and enforcement shall be carried out by an agency or department designated by the local governing body.

Complaints by tenants. However, upon a finding by the local building department, following a complaint by a tenant of a residential dwelling unit that is the subject of such complaint, that there may be a violation of the unsafe structures provisions of the Building Code, the local building department shall enforce such provisions.

Inspection warrants. If the local building department receives a complaint that a violation of the Building Code exists that is an immediate and imminent threat to the health or safety of the owner, tenant, or occupants of any building or structure, or the owner, occupant, or tenant of any nearby building or structure, and the owner, occupant, or tenant of the building or structure that is the subject of the complaint has refused to allow the local building official or his agent to have access to the subject building or structure, the local building official or his agent may make an affidavit under oath before a magistrate or a court of competent jurisdiction and request that the magistrate or court grant the local building official or his agent an inspection warrant to enable the building official or his agent to enter the subject building or structure for the purpose of determining whether violations of the Building Code exist. After issuing a warrant under this section, the magistrate or judge shall file the affidavit in the manner prescribed by §

19.2-54

. After executing the warrant, the local building official or his agents shall return the warrant to the clerk of the circuit court of the city or county wherein the inspection was made. The local building official or his agent shall make a reasonable effort to obtain consent from the owner, occupant, or tenant of the subject building or structure prior to seeking the issuance of an inspection warrant under this section.

Transfer of ownership. If the local building department has initiated an enforcement action against the owner of a building or structure and such owner subsequently transfers the ownership of the building or structure to an entity in which the owner holds an ownership interest greater than 50 percent, the pending enforcement action shall continue to be enforced against the owner.

Elevator, escalator, or related conveyance inspections. The local governing body shall, however, inspect and enforce the Building Code for elevators, escalators, or related conveyances, except for elevators in single- and two-family homes and townhouses. Such inspection shall be carried out by an agency or department designated by the local governing body.

A locality may require by ordinance that any landmark, building or structure that contributes to a district delineated pursuant to §

15.2-2306

shall not be razed, demolished or moved until the razing, demolition or moving thereof is approved by the review board, or, on appeal, by the governing body after consultation with the review board unless the local maintenance code official consistent with the Uniform Statewide Building Code, Part III Maintenance, determines that it constitutes such a hazard that it shall be razed, demolished or moved.For the purpose of this subdivision, a contributing landmark, building or structure is one that adds to or is consistent with the historic or architectural qualities, historic associations, or values for which the district was established pursuant to §

15.2-2306

, because it (i) was present during the period of significance, (ii) relates to the documented significance of the district, and (iii) possesses historic integrity or is capable of yielding important information about the period.

Fees may be levied by the local governing body in order to defray the cost of such enforcement and appeals. For purposes of this section, “defray the cost” may include the fair and reasonable costs incurred for such enforcement during normal business hours, but shall not include overtime costs unless conducted outside of the normal working hours established by the locality. A schedule of such costs shall be adopted by the local governing body in a local ordinance. A locality shall not charge an overtime rate for inspections conducted during the normal business hours established by the locality. With the exception of the levy imposed pursuant to §

36-137

, any fees levied pursuant to this subdivision shall be used only to support the functions of the local building department. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit a private entity from conducting such inspections, provided the private entity has been approved to perform such inspections in accordance with the written policy of the maintenance code official for the locality.

Issuance of permits.

Fees may be levied by the local governing body to be paid by the applicant for the issuance of a building permit as otherwise provided under this chapter; however, notwithstanding any provision of law, general or special, if the applicant for a building permit is a tenant or the owner of an easement on the owner’s property, such applicant shall not be denied a permit under the Building Code solely upon the basis that the property owner has financial obligations to the locality that constitute a lien on such property in favor of the locality. If such applicant is the property owner, in addition to payment of the fees for issuance of a building permit, the locality may require full payment of any and all financial obligations of the property owner to the locality to satisfy such lien prior to issuance of such permit. For purposes of this subdivision, “property owner” means the owner of such property as reflected in the land records of the circuit court clerk where the property is located, the owner’s agent, or any entity in which the owner holds an ownership interest greater than 50 percent.

In the event that a local building department denies an application for the issuance of a building permit, the local building department shall provide to the applicant a written explanation detailing the reasons for which the application was denied. The applicant may submit a revised application addressing the reasons for which the application was previously denied, and if the applicant does so, the local building department shall be encouraged, but not required, to limit its review of the revised application to only those portions of the application that were previously deemed inadequate and that the applicant has revised.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1974, c. 433; 1977, cc. 423, 613; 1978, c. 578; 1981, c. 498; 1982, c. 267; 1992, c. 73; 1993, c. 328; 1994, cc. 214, 256, 574; 1995, cc. 95, 523, 702, 827; 1999, cc. 333, 341; 2001, c. 119; 2002, c. 720; 2003, c. 650; 2004, c. 851; 2006, c. 424; 2007, c. 291; 2009, cc. 181, 184, 551, 586; 2010, c. 63; 2012, cc. 494, 607; 2014, c. 354; 2018, c. 222; 2019, c. 698.

Cross references.

As to inspection of boiler or pressure vessels, see §

40.1-51.15:1

.

The 1995 amendments.

The 1995 amendment by c. 95 added the third sentence of the next-to-last paragraph.

The 1995 amendment by c. 523 substituted “less than $2,500” for “less than $1,000” near the middle of the second paragraph.

The 1995 amendments by cc. 702 and 827 are identical, and inserted “or in other areas designated as blighted pursuant to §

36-49.1:1

” following “by the local governing body” near the middle of the first sentence in the last paragraph.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 333 and 341 are identical, and in the third paragraph, deleted “including such regulations for elevators” at the end of the first sentence and inserted the second sentence.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 119, in the third paragraph, in the third sentence, substituted “that” for “which,” substituted “the unsafe structures provisions of” for “§ 105 of Volume II of,” and substituted “such provisions” for “§ 105 of Volume II,” and added the last two sentences, and in the last paragraph, deleted “Uniform Statewide” preceding “Building Code.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 720, in the final paragraph, inserted “or at specific time intervals . . . rental property is sold” at the end of the first sentence, and inserted the present third and fourth sentences.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 650 in the first paragraph, inserted “provisions of the” and “for construction and rehabilitation” in the first sentence, and deleted “covering the manner of construction or materials to be used in the erection, alteration or repair of a building or structure” following the first occurrence of “Building Code” in the third sentence; inserted “the provisions of,” and made minor punctuation changes in the first sentence of the third paragraph; and substituted “12” for “twelve” in the last paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 851 added subsection designations and headings A, B and C and subdivision headings C 1 through C 3; in subdivision C 1, deleted the second sentence, which read: “The local governing body, however, shall inspect and enforce the Building Code for elevators except for elevators in single and two-family homes and townhouses.”; in subdivision C 2, substituted “dwelling unit” for “rental unit”; in subdivision C 3, inserted “magistrate or a” preceding “court of competent” and “magistrate or” preceding “court grant”; deleted the former last paragraph relating to building inspections; and added subsection D.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 424 added subdivision C 4.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 291, in subsection B, added the third sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 181 and 551, are identical and in subdivision C 3, in the first sentence, substituted “the owner, tenant, or occupants of any building or structure, or the owner, occupant or tenant of any nearby building or structure, and the owner, occupant, or tenant of the building or structure” for “the owner, or a residential dwelling unit or a nearby residential dwelling unit and the owner or tenant of the residential dwelling unit” and “building or structure” for “dwelling” in two places and “occupant, or tenant of the subject building or structure” for “or tenant of the subject dwelling” in the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 184 and 586 are identical and redesignated former subsection D as subdivision C 5; and in subdivision C 5, inserted “escalator, or related conveyance” in the subdivision heading and “escalators, or related conveyances” in the first sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 63 substituted “Any person aggrieved by the local building department’s application” for “Appeals from the local building department concerning application” at the beginning, and “may appeal” for “shall first lie” near the middle of the third sentence of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 494 added subdivision C 6.

The 2012 amendment by c. 607 transferred the former last sentence of subsection A to become the present last sentence of subsection B, and added subdivision C 6 and subsection D. Subdivision C 6 was redesignated as subdivision C 7 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 354 in subdivision C 3 substituted “make an affidavit under oath before” for “present sworn testimony to,” and added the second and third sentences.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 222, in the second paragraph of subsection A, inserted “that” preceding “such town” in the second sentence; and added the third sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 698, in subsection B, added the last sentence; in subdivision C 7, inserted the fifth sentence; added subsection D; redesignated former subsection D as subdivision D 1; added subdivision D 2; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For comment on local liability for negligent inspection of buildings and equipment, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 809 (1984).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-748 Affidavit for Building Inspection Warrant, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 17; 6B M.J. Elevators, § 2; 9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 5; 17 M.J. State, § 10.

§ 36-105.01.
Elevator inspections by contract.

The inspection of elevators in existing buildings and the enforcement of the Building Code for elevators shall be in compliance with the regulations adopted by the Board. The building department may also provide for such inspection by an approved agency or through agreement with other local certified elevator inspectors. An approved agency includes any individual, partnership or corporation who has met the certification requirements established by the Board. The Board shall establish such qualifications and procedures as it deems necessary to certify an approved agency. Such qualifications and procedures shall be based upon nationally accepted standards.

History.

1994, c. 574; 1999, cc. 333, 341.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 333 and 341 are identical, and substituted “The inspection of elevators in existing buildings and the enforcement of the Building Code for elevators” for “If the local building department elects to inspect and enforce building regulations for elevators in existing buildings, then such inspection and enforcement.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elevators, § 2.

§ 36-105.1.
Inspection and review of plans of buildings under construction.

Inspections of buildings other than state-owned buildings under construction and the review and approval of building plans for these structures for enforcement of the Uniform Statewide Building Code shall be the sole responsibility of the appropriate local building inspectors. Upon completion of such structures, responsibility for fire safety protection shall pass to the State Fire Marshal pursuant to the Statewide Fire Prevention Code in those localities which do not enforce the Statewide Fire Prevention Code (§

27-94

et seq.).

History.

1989, c. 258.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elevators, § 2.

§ 36-105.1:1.
Rental inspections; rental inspection districts; exemptions; penalties.

For purposes of this section:“Dwelling unit” means a building or structure or part thereof that is used for a home or residence by one or more persons who maintain a household.“Owner” means the person shown on the current real estate assessment books or current real estate assessment records.“Residential rental dwelling unit” means a dwelling unit that is leased or rented to one or more tenants. However, a dwelling unit occupied in part by the owner thereof shall not be construed to be a residential rental dwelling unit unless a tenant occupies a part of the dwelling unit which has its own cooking and sleeping areas, and a bathroom, unless otherwise provided in the zoning ordinance by the local governing body.

Localities may inspect residential rental dwelling units. The local governing body may adopt an ordinance to inspect residential rental dwelling units for compliance with the Building Code and to promote safe, decent and sanitary housing for its citizens, in accordance with the following:

Except as provided in subdivision B 3, the dwelling units shall be located in a rental inspection district established by the local governing body in accordance with this section, and

The rental inspection district is based upon a finding by the local governing body that (i) there is a need to protect the public health, safety and welfare of the occupants of dwelling units inside the designated rental inspection district; (ii) the residential rental dwelling units within the designated rental inspection district are either (a) blighted or in the process of deteriorating, or (b) the residential rental dwelling units are in the need of inspection by the building department to prevent deterioration, taking into account the number, age and condition of residential dwelling rental units inside the proposed rental inspection district; and (iii) the inspection of residential rental dwelling units inside the proposed rental inspection district is necessary to maintain safe, decent and sanitary living conditions for tenants and other residents living in the proposed rental inspection district. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize one or more locality-wide rental inspection districts and a local governing body shall limit the boundaries of the proposed rental inspection districts to such areas of the locality that meet the criteria set out in this subsection, or

An individual residential rental dwelling unit outside of a designated rental inspection district is made subject to the rental inspection ordinance based upon a separate finding for each individual dwelling unit by the local governing body that (i) there is a need to protect the public health, welfare and safety of the occupants of that individual dwelling unit; (ii) the individual dwelling unit is either (a) blighted or (b) in the process of deteriorating; or (iii) there is evidence of violations of the Building Code that affect the safe, decent and sanitary living conditions for tenants living in such individual dwelling unit.For purposes of this section, the local governing body may designate a local government agency other than the building department to perform all or part of the duties contained in the enforcement authority granted to the building department by this section.

Notification to owners of dwelling units. Before adopting a rental inspection ordinance and establishing a rental inspection district or an amendment to either, the governing body of the locality shall hold a public hearing on the proposed ordinance. Notice of the hearing shall be published once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper published or having general circulation in the locality.Upon adoption by the local governing body of a rental inspection ordinance, the building department shall make reasonable efforts to notify owners of residential rental dwelling units in the designated rental inspection district, or their designated managing agents, and to any individual dwelling units subject to the rental inspection ordinance, not located in a rental inspection district, of the adoption of such ordinance, and provide information and an explanation of the rental inspection ordinance and the responsibilities of the owner thereunder.
C. 1. Notification to owners of dwelling units. Before adopting a rental inspection ordinance and establishing a rental inspection district or an amendment to either, the governing body of the locality shall hold a public hearing on the proposed ordinance. Notice of the hearing shall be published once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper published or having general circulation in the locality.Upon adoption by the local governing body of a rental inspection ordinance, the building department shall make reasonable efforts to notify owners of residential rental dwelling units in the designated rental inspection district, or their designated managing agents, and to any individual dwelling units subject to the rental inspection ordinance, not located in a rental inspection district, of the adoption of such ordinance, and provide information and an explanation of the rental inspection ordinance and the responsibilities of the owner thereunder.

Notification by owners of dwelling units to locality. The rental inspection ordinance may include a provision that requires the owners of dwelling units in a rental inspection district to notify the building department in writing if the dwelling unit of the owner is used for residential rental purposes. The building department may develop a form for such purposes. The rental inspection ordinance shall not include a registration requirement or a fee of any kind associated with the written notification pursuant to this subdivision. A rental inspection ordinance may not require that the written notification from the owner of a dwelling unit subject to a rental inspection ordinance be provided to the building department in less than 60 days after the adoption of a rental inspection ordinance. However, there shall be no penalty for the failure of an owner of a residential rental dwelling unit to comply with the provisions of this subsection, unless and until the building department provides personal or written notice to the property owner, as provided in this section. In any event, the sole penalty for the willful failure of an owner of a dwelling unit who is using the dwelling unit for residential rental purposes to comply with the written notification requirement shall be a civil penalty of up to $50. For purposes of this subsection, notice sent by regular first class mail to the last known address of the owner as shown on the current real estate tax assessment books or current real estate tax assessment records shall be deemed compliance with this requirement.

Initial inspection of dwelling units when rental inspection district is established. Upon establishment of a rental inspection district in accordance with this section, the building department may, in conjunction with the written notifications as provided for in subsection C, proceed to inspect dwelling units in the designated rental inspection district to determine if the dwelling units are being used as a residential rental property and for compliance with the provisions of the Building Code that affect the safe, decent and sanitary living conditions for the tenants of such property.

Provisions for initial and periodic inspections of multifamily dwelling units. If a multifamily development has more than 10 dwelling units, in the initial and periodic inspections, the building department shall inspect only a sampling of dwelling units, of not less than two and not more than 10 percent of the dwelling units, of a multifamily development, which includes all of the multifamily buildings which are part of that multifamily development. In no event, however, shall the building department charge a fee authorized by this section for inspection of more than 10 dwelling units. If the building department determines upon inspection of the sampling of dwelling units that there are violations of the Building Code that affect the safe, decent and sanitary living conditions for the tenants of such multifamily development, the building department may inspect as many dwelling units as necessary to enforce the Building Code, in which case, the fee shall be based upon a charge per dwelling unit inspected, as otherwise provided in subsection H.

Follow-up inspections. Upon the initial or periodic inspection of a residential rental dwelling unit subject to a rental inspection ordinance, the building department has the authority under the Building Code to require the owner of the dwelling unit to submit to such follow-up inspections of the dwelling unit as the building department deems necessary, until such time as the dwelling unit is brought into compliance with the provisions of the Building Code that affect the safe, decent and sanitary living conditions for the tenants.
F. 1. Follow-up inspections. Upon the initial or periodic inspection of a residential rental dwelling unit subject to a rental inspection ordinance, the building department has the authority under the Building Code to require the owner of the dwelling unit to submit to such follow-up inspections of the dwelling unit as the building department deems necessary, until such time as the dwelling unit is brought into compliance with the provisions of the Building Code that affect the safe, decent and sanitary living conditions for the tenants.

Periodic inspections. Except as provided in subdivision F 1, following the initial inspection of a residential rental dwelling unit subject to a rental inspection ordinance, the building department may inspect any residential rental dwelling unit in a rental inspection district, that is not otherwise exempted in accordance with this section, no more than once each calendar year.

Exemptions from rental inspection ordinance.

Upon the initial or periodic inspection of a residential rental dwelling unit subject to a rental inspection ordinance for compliance with the Building Code, provided that there are no violations of the Building Code that affect the safe, decent and sanitary living conditions for the tenants of such residential rental dwelling unit, the building department shall provide, to the owner of such residential rental dwelling unit, an exemption from the rental inspection ordinance for a minimum of four years. Upon the sale of a residential rental dwelling unit, the building department may perform a periodic inspection as provided in subdivision F 2, subsequent to such sale. If a residential rental dwelling unit has been issued a certificate of occupancy within the last four years, an exemption shall be granted for a minimum period of four years from the date of the issuance of the certificate of occupancy by the building department. If the residential rental dwelling unit becomes in violation of the Building Code during the exemption period, the building department may revoke the exemption previously granted under this section.

The local governing body may exempt a residential rental unit otherwise subject to a rental inspection ordinance provided such unit is managed by (i) any person licensed under the provisions of §

54.1-2106.1

; (ii) any (a) property manager or (b) managing agent of a landlord as defined in § 551-1200; (iii) any owner of a publicly traded entity that manages its own multifamily residential rental units; or (iv) any owner or managing agent who, in the determination of the local governing body, has achieved a satisfactory designation as a professional property manager.

A local governing body may establish a fee schedule for enforcement of the Building Code, which includes a per dwelling unit fee for the initial inspections, follow-up inspections and periodic inspections under this section.

The provisions of this section shall not, in any way, alter the rights and obligations of landlords and tenants pursuant to the applicable provisions of Chapter 12 (§

55.1-1200

et seq.) or Chapter 14 (§

55.1-1400

et seq.) of Title 55.1.

The provisions of this section shall not alter the duties or responsibilities of the local building department under §

36-105

to enforce the Building Code.

Unless otherwise provided in this section, penalties for violation of this section shall be the same as the penalties provided in the Building Code.

History.

2004, c. 851; 2009, c. 663; 2016, c. 338.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 851, cl. 2 provides: “That any local rental inspection ordinances adopted on or before July 1, 2004, shall be brought into compliance with the requirements of §

36-105.1:1

of this act by July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2011, c. 766, cl. 2, repealed Acts 2009, c. 663, cl. 2. Acts 2009, c. 663, cl. 2 had provided that nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate any rental inspection district established before January 1, 2009.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitutions were made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted
“55.1-1200” for “55-248.4” and “Chapter 12 (§

55.1-1200

et seq.) or Chapter 14 (§

55.1-1400

et seq.) of Title 55.1” for “Chapter 13 (§ 55-217 et seq.) or Chapter 13.2 (§ 55-248.2 et seq.) of Title 55.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 663, in subdivision B 2, in the last sentence, substituted “authorize one or more” for “authorize a” and “districts” for “district.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 338 added subdivision G 2.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Creation of multiple rental inspection districts. —

Fairfax, Va., Ordinance No. 2008-18. which created two rental inspection districts that together comprised the entirety of the city, did not violate the terms of the enabling statute, subsection B of §

36-105.1:1

, prohibiting the creation of a single rental inspection district that encompassed the entire locality. MacDonald v. City of Fairfax, 80 Va. Cir. 567, 2010 Va. Cir. LEXIS 96 (Fairfax July 14, 2010).

§ 36-105.2.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

Former §

36-105.2

, which provided an expedited building plan review program, was enacted by 1997, c. 352, and expired July 1, 2002, pursuant to the terms of Acts 1997, c. 352, cl. 2.

§ 36-105.3.
Security of certain records.

Building Code officials shall institute procedures to ensure the safe storage and secure handling by local officials having access to or in the possession of engineering and construction drawings and plans containing critical structural components, security equipment and systems, ventilation systems, fire protection equipment, mandatory building emergency equipment or systems, elevators, electrical systems, telecommunications equipment and systems, and other utility equipment and systems submitted for the purpose of complying with the Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.) or the Statewide Fire Prevention Code (§

27-94

et seq.).

Further, information contained in engineering and construction drawings and plans for any single-family residential dwelling submitted for the purpose of complying with the Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.) or the Statewide Fire Prevention Code (§

27-94

et seq.) shall not be subject to disclosure under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), except to the applicant or the owner of the property upon the applicant’s or owner’s request.

History.

2003, c. 891; 2017, c. 510; 2018, cc. 42, 92.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 510 added the second paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 42 and 92 are identical, and deleted “shall be confidential and” following “Fire Prevention Code (§

27-94

et seq.)” in the second paragraph.

§ 36-105.4.
Occupancy standards for residential dwelling units.

The owner or managing agent of a residential dwelling unit may develop and implement occupancy standards restricting the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling unit to two persons per bedroom, which is presumed to be reasonable. For purposes of Chapter 5.1 (§

36-96.1

et seq.), such occupancy standard is subject to the provisions of applicable state and federal laws and regulations. Under the Uniform Statewide Building Code, each bedroom shall contain at least 70 square feet of floor area, and each bedroom occupied by more than one person shall contain at least 50 square feet of floor area for each occupant. Reasonable occupancy standards of an owner or managing agent shall not be enforceable under the provisions of the Uniform Statewide Building Code.

History.

2013, c. 526.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-230 Use of Premises; No. 16-401 Land Sales Contract, et seq.

§ 36-105.5.
Enforcement of Building Code on Indian reservations.

Recognizing the unique relationship between the Commonwealth and certain of its state-recognized Indian tribes, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, neither the Commonwealth nor any locality therein is responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of the Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.) on any Indian reservation recognized by the Commonwealth whereupon a state-recognized Indian tribe has, by duly enacted tribal ordinance, adopted the Uniform Statewide Building Code and (i) assumed sole responsibility for existing buildings and new construction on the reservation and (ii) for purposes of enforcing the ordinance, retained firms or individuals to function as the building official on such reservation.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to confer or infer responsibility or liability on any party for any action undertaken prior to July 1, 2015.

History.

2015, c. 135.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 135,
cl. 1 was codified as subsection A of this section. Acts 2015, c. 135,
cl. 2 was codified as subsection B.